Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-716
Federal Home Loan Bank members; tax exemption prohibited.

No institution incorporated under the laws of this state which is or becomes a member of a Federal Home Loan Bank shall be exempt from any taxes of this state, including any contributions required to be paid under sections 48-648 to 48-654.

Laws 1937, c. 51, § 3, p. 214;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-603;

R.S.1943, § 8-716;

Laws 1991, LB 77, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 1.